Tennessee, session 114, HB0980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 69, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) A tourism development authority formed pursuant to this chapter owning a
tract of real property, of which all or any portion thereof is contained within the
incorporated territory of a municipality, may petition the municipality to deannex such
property if the deannexation of the property does not create an area of unincorporated
territory that is completely surrounded by municipal boundaries.
(b) The petition must include a map of the plat seeking deannexation.
(c) Upon receiving the petition for deannexation, the municipality shall determine
the debt amount owed pursuant to § 6-51-204(a), if any, within thirty (30) days.
(d) The deannexation of the property becomes operative sixty (60) days after
receipt of the petition by the municipality.
(e) Except for responsibility for debt newly contracted after the territory was
annexed and prior to the surrender of jurisdiction, all municipal jurisdiction ceases over
the territory excluded from the municipality's corporate limits on the operative date of the
contraction accomplished through the petition described in this section.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0980
003012
- 1 -